test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ialaan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - iäláán: # 1B
    iäláán+N+Sg+Nom: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Gen: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Acc: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Ill: iälánân
    iäláán+N+Sg+Loc: iälánist
    iäláán+N+Sg+Com: iälánáin
    iäláán+N+Sg+Abe: iäláánttáá
    iäláán+N+Ess:    iälánin
    iäláán+N+Par:    iälánid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Nom: iäláneh
    iäláán+N+Pl+Gen: iälánij
    iäláán+N+Pl+Acc: iälánijd
    iäláán+N+Pl+Ill: iälánáid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Loc: iälánijn
    iäláán+N+Pl+Com: iälánijguin
    iäláán+N+Pl+Abe: iälánijttáá
